California statutes. Penal Code
(g) Is accessible in a timely manner to incarcerated persons that have recently changed status, security level, or facility.

(h) Offers a variety of programming opportunities to incarcerated persons regardless of security level or sentence length.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 579, Sec. 2.   (AB 292)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2934.

Under rules prescribed by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, a prisoner subject to the provisions of Section 2931 may waive the right to receive time credits as provided in Section 2931 and be subject to the provisions of Section 2933. In order to exercise a waiver under this section, a prisoner must apply in writing to the Department of Corrections. A prisoner exercising a waiver under this section shall retain only that portion of good behavior and participation credits, which have not been forfeited pursuant to Section 2932, attributable to the portion of the sentence served by the prisoner prior to
 the effective date of the waiver. A waiver under this section shall, if accepted by the department, become effective at a time to be determined by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 45.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2935.

Under the guidelines prescribed by the rules and regulations of the director, the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may grant up to 12 additional months of reduction of the sentence to a prisoner who has performed a heroic act in a life-threatening situation, or who has provided exceptional assistance in maintaining the safety and security of a prison.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 46.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2936.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit a report to the relevant fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office whenever the department proposes regulatory changes pursuant to Section 32 of Article I of the California Constitution that would affect inmate credit earning.

(b) A report required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include both of the following:

(1) An explanation of the rationale for each of the proposed changes to credit earning.

(2) An estimate of the impact of the proposed changes to credit earning on the size of inmate and parolee
 populations.

(c) Reports required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted on or before the day that the regulatory changes are first submitted to the Office of Administrative Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 25, Sec. 41.   (SB 94)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Blacklist or Extortion of Discharged Prisoner [2947. - 2947.]

2947.

Any person who knowingly and willfully communicates to another, either orally or in writing, any statement concerning any person then or theretofore convicted of a felony, and then finally discharged, and which communication is made with the purpose and intent to deprive such person so convicted of employment, or to prevent him from procuring the same, or with the purpose and intent to extort from him any money or article of value; and any person who threatens to make any such communication with the purpose and intent to extort money or any article of value from such person so convicted of a felony is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 165.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Disposition of Mentally Disordered Prisoners Upon Discharge [2960. - 2981.]

2960.

(a) The Legislature finds that there are prisoners who have a treatable, severe mental health disorder that was one of the causes of, or was an aggravating factor in, the commission of the crime for which they were incarcerated. Secondly, the Legislature finds that if the severe mental health disorders of those prisoners are not in remission or cannot be kept in remission at the time of their parole or upon termination of parole, there is a danger to society, and the state has a compelling interest in protecting the public. Thirdly, the Legislature finds that in order to protect the public from those persons, it is necessary to provide mental health treatment until the severe mental health disorder that
 was one of the causes of or was an aggravating factor in the person’s prior criminal behavior is in remission and can be kept in remission.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation should evaluate each prisoner for severe mental health disorders during the first year of the prisoner’s sentence, and that prisoners with severe mental health disorders should be provided with an appropriate level of mental health treatment while in prison and when returned to the community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 9, Sec. 6.   (AB 46)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2962.

As a condition of parole, a prisoner who meets the following criteria shall be provided necessary treatment by the State Department of State Hospitals as follows:

(a) (1) The prisoner has a severe mental health disorder that is not in remission or that cannot be kept in remission without treatment.

(2) The term “severe mental health disorder” means an illness, disease, or condition that substantially impairs the person’s thought, perception of reality, emotional process, or judgment; or that grossly impairs behavior; or that demonstrates evidence of an acute brain syndrome for which prompt remission, in the absence of treatment, is unlikely. The term “severe mental health disorder,” as used in this
 section, does not include a personality or adjustment disorder, epilepsy, intellectual disability or other developmental disabilities, or addiction to or abuse of intoxicating substances.

(3) The term “remission” means a finding that the overt signs and symptoms of the severe mental health disorder are controlled either by psychotropic medication or psychosocial support. A person “cannot be kept in remission without treatment” if during the year prior to the question being before the Board of Parole Hearings or a trial court, the person has been in remission and has been physically violent, except in self-defense, or has made a serious threat of substantial physical harm upon the person of another so as to cause the target of the threat to reasonably fear for their safety or the safety of their immediate family, or the person has intentionally caused property damage, or has not voluntarily followed the treatment plan. In determining if a person
 has voluntarily followed the treatment plan, the standard is whether the person has acted as a reasonable person would in following the treatment plan.

(b) The severe mental health disorder was one of the causes of, or was an aggravating factor in, the commission of a crime for which the prisoner was sentenced to prison.

(c) The prisoner has been in treatment for the severe mental health disorder for 90 days or more within the year prior to the prisoner’s parole or release.

(d) (1) Prior to release on parole, the person in charge of treating the prisoner and a practicing psychiatrist or psychologist from the State Department of State Hospitals have evaluated the prisoner at a facility of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, and a chief psychiatrist of the Department of Corrections
 and Rehabilitation has certified to the Board of Parole Hearings that the prisoner has a severe mental health disorder, that the disorder is not in remission or cannot be kept in remission without treatment, that the severe mental health disorder was one of the causes or was an aggravating factor in the prisoner’s criminal behavior, that the prisoner has been in treatment for the severe mental health disorder for 90 days or more within the year prior to the prisoner’s parole release day, and that by reason of the prisoner’s severe mental health disorder, the prisoner represents a substantial danger of physical harm to others.

(A) For prisoners being treated by the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to Section 2684, the certification shall be by a chief psychiatrist of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, and the evaluation shall be conducted at a state hospital by the person at the state hospital in charge of treating the
 prisoner and a practicing psychiatrist or psychologist from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(B) For the evaluation of Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation prisoners who are temporarily housed at a county correctional facility, a county medical facility, or a state-assigned mental health provider, a practicing psychiatrist or psychologist from the State Department of State Hospitals, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or the Board of Parole Hearings shall be afforded prompt and unimpeded access to the prisoner and their records for the period of confinement at that facility upon submission of current and valid proof of state employment and a departmental letter or memorandum arranging the appointment.

(2) If the professionals doing the evaluation pursuant to paragraph (1) do not concur that (A) the prisoner has a severe mental health
 disorder, (B) that the disorder is not in remission or cannot be kept in remission without treatment, or (C) that the severe mental health disorder was a cause of, or aggravated, the prisoner’s criminal behavior, and a chief psychiatrist has certified the prisoner to the Board of Parole Hearings pursuant to this paragraph, the Board of Parole Hearings shall order a further examination by two independent professionals, as provided for in Section 2978.

(3) If at least one of the independent professionals who evaluate the prisoner pursuant to paragraph (2) concurs with the chief psychiatrist’s certification of the issues described in paragraph (2), this subdivision shall be applicable to the prisoner. The professionals appointed pursuant to Section 2978 shall inform the prisoner that the purpose of their examination is not treatment, but to determine if the prisoner meets certain criteria to be involuntarily treated as an offender with a mental
 health disorder. It is not required that the prisoner appreciate or understand that information.

(e) The crime referred to in subdivision (b) meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The defendant received a determinate sentence pursuant to Section 1170 for the crime.

(2) The crime is one of the following:

(A) Voluntary manslaughter.

(B) Mayhem.

(C) Kidnapping in violation of Section 207.

(D) A robbery wherein it was charged and proved that the defendant personally used a deadly or dangerous weapon, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 12022, in the
 commission of that robbery.

(E) Carjacking, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 215, if it is charged and proved that the defendant personally used a deadly or dangerous weapon, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 12022, in the commission of the carjacking.

(F) Rape, as defined in paragraph (2) or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 261 or paragraph (1) or (4) of subdivision (a) of former Section 262.

(G) Sodomy by force, violence, duress, menace, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury on the victim or another person.

(H) Oral copulation by force, violence, duress, menace, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury on the victim or another person.

(I) Lewd acts on a
 child under 14 years of age in violation of Section 288.

(J) Continuous sexual abuse in violation of Section 288.5.

(K) The offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 289 if the act was accomplished against the victim’s will by force, violence, duress, menace, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury on the victim or another person.

(L) Arson in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 451, or arson in violation of any other provision of Section 451 or in violation of Section 455 if the act posed a substantial danger of physical harm to others.

(M) A felony in which the defendant used a firearm which use was charged and proved as provided in Section 12022.5, 12022.53, or 12022.55.

(N) A violation of Section 18745.

(O) Attempted murder.

(P) A crime not enumerated in subparagraphs (A) to (O), inclusive, in which the prisoner used force or violence, or caused serious bodily injury as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 243.

(Q) A crime in which the perpetrator expressly or impliedly threatened another with the use of force or violence likely to produce substantial physical harm in a manner that a reasonable person would believe and expect that the force or violence would be used. For purposes of this subparagraph, substantial physical harm does not require proof that the threatened act was likely to cause great or serious bodily injury.

(f) For purposes of meeting the criteria set forth in this
 section, the existence or nature of the crime, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), for which the prisoner has been convicted may be shown with documentary evidence. The details underlying the commission of the offense that led to the conviction, including the use of force or violence, causing serious bodily injury, or the threat to use force or violence likely to produce substantial physical harm, may be shown by documentary evidence, including, but not limited to, preliminary hearing transcripts, trial transcripts, probation and sentencing reports, and evaluations by the State Department of State Hospitals.

(g) As used in this chapter, “substantial danger of physical harm” does not require proof of a recent overt act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 58.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2963.

(a) Upon a showing of good cause, the Board of Parole Hearings may order that a person remain in custody for no more than 45 days beyond the person’s scheduled release date for full evaluation pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 2962 and any additional evaluations pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 2962.

(b) For purposes of this section, good cause means circumstances where there is a recalculation of credits or a restoration of denied or lost credits, a resentencing by a court, the receipt of the prisoner into custody, or equivalent exigent circumstances which result in there being less than 45 days prior to the person’s scheduled release date for the evaluations
 described in subdivision (d) of Section 2962.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 710, Sec. 2.   (SB 1201)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2964.

(a) The treatment required by Section 2962 shall be inpatient unless the State Department of State Hospitals certifies to the Board of Parole Hearings that there is reasonable cause to believe the parolee can be safely and effectively treated on an outpatient basis, in which case the Board of Parole Hearings shall permit the State Department of State Hospitals to place the parolee in an outpatient treatment program specified by the State Department of State Hospitals. Any prisoner who is to be required to accept treatment pursuant to Section 2962 shall be informed in writing of his or her right to request a hearing pursuant to Section 2966. Prior to placing a parolee in a local outpatient program, the State Department of State Hospitals shall
 consult with the local outpatient program as to the appropriate treatment plan. Notwithstanding any other law, a parolee ordered to have outpatient treatment pursuant to this section may be placed in an outpatient treatment program used to provide outpatient treatment under Title 15 (commencing with Section 1600) of Part 2, but the procedural provisions of Title 15 shall not apply. The community program director or a designee of an outpatient program used to provide treatment under Title 15 in which a parolee is placed, may place the parolee, or cause the parolee to be placed, in a secure mental health facility if the parolee can no longer be safely or effectively treated in the outpatient program, and until the parolee can be safely and effectively treated in the program. Upon the request of the community program director or a designee, a peace officer shall take the parolee into custody and transport the parolee, or cause the parolee to be taken into custody and transported, to a facility designated by the
 community program director, or a designee, for confinement under this section. Within 15 days after placement in a secure facility the State Department of State Hospitals shall conduct a hearing on whether the parolee can be safely and effectively treated in the program unless the patient or the patient’s attorney agrees to a continuance, or unless good cause exists that prevents the State Department of State Hospitals from conducting the hearing within that period of time. If good cause exists, the hearing shall be held within 21 days after placement in a secure facility. For purposes of this section, “good cause” means the inability to secure counsel, an interpreter, or witnesses for the hearing within the 15-day time period. Before deciding to seek revocation of the parole of a parolee receiving mental health treatment pursuant to Section 2962, and return him or her to prison, the parole officer shall consult with the director of the parolee’s outpatient program. Nothing in this section shall prevent
 hospitalization pursuant to Section 5150, 5250, or 5353 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) If the State Department of State Hospitals has not placed a parolee on outpatient treatment within 60 days after receiving custody of the parolee or after parole is continued pursuant to Section 3001, the parolee may request a hearing before the Board of Parole Hearings, and the board shall conduct a hearing to determine whether the prisoner shall be treated as an inpatient or an outpatient. At the hearing, the burden shall be on the State Department of State Hospitals to establish that the prisoner requires inpatient treatment as described in this subdivision. If the prisoner or any person appearing on his or her behalf at the hearing requests it, the board shall appoint two independent professionals as provided for in Section 2978.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 37.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2966.

(a) A prisoner may request a hearing before the Board of Parole Hearings, and the board shall conduct a hearing if so requested, for the purpose of proving that the prisoner meets the criteria in Section 2962. At the hearing, the burden of proof shall be on the person or agency who certified the prisoner under subdivision (d) of Section 2962. If the prisoner or any person appearing on the prisoner’s behalf at the hearing requests it, the board shall appoint two independent professionals as provided for in Section 2978. The prisoner shall be informed at the hearing of the right to request a trial pursuant to subdivision (b). The Board of Parole Hearings shall provide a prisoner who requests trial a petition form and instructions for filing the
 petition.

(b) A prisoner who disagrees with the determination of the Board of Parole Hearings that the prisoner meets the criteria of Section 2962 may file in the superior court of the county in which the prisoner is incarcerated or is being treated a petition for a hearing on whether the prisoner, as of the date of the Board of Parole Hearings hearing, met the criteria of Section 2962. The court shall conduct a hearing on the petition within 60 calendar days after the petition is filed, unless either time is waived by the petitioner or the petitioner’s counsel or good cause is shown. Evidence offered for the purpose of proving the prisoner’s behavior or mental status subsequent to the Board of Parole Hearings hearing shall not be considered. The order of the Board of Parole Hearings shall be in effect until the completion of the court
 proceedings. The court shall advise the petitioner of the right to be represented by an attorney and of the right to a jury trial. The attorney for the petitioner shall be given a copy of the petition and any supporting documents. The hearing shall be a civil hearing. In order to reduce costs, the rules of criminal discovery, as well as civil discovery, shall be applicable. The standard of proof shall be beyond a reasonable doubt, and if the trial is by jury, the jury shall be unanimous in its verdict. The trial shall be by jury unless waived by both the person and the district attorney. The court may, upon stipulation of both parties, receive in evidence the affidavit or declaration of any psychiatrist, psychologist, or other professional person who was involved in the certification and hearing process, or any professional person involved in the evaluation or treatment of the petitioner during the
 certification process. The court may allow the affidavit or declaration to be read and the contents thereof considered in the rendering of a decision or verdict in any proceeding held pursuant to this subdivision, or subdivision (c), or subdivision (a) of Section 2972. If the court or jury reverses the determination of the Board of Parole Hearings, the court shall stay the execution of the decision for up to 30 days to allow for an orderly release of the prisoner. The court may require the parties to return to the court during those 30 days to ensure that the entities involved in the release of the prisoner have coordinated an exit plan for the prisoner. If the court or jury reverses the determination of the Board of Parole Hearings, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, upon a determination that the individual
 is eligible for release pursuant to Section 3451, shall notify the probation department of the county of supervision of the pending release within five working days of the court order and work with the county of supervision to coordinate the orderly and safe release of the prisoner.

(c) If the Board of Parole Hearings continues a parolee’s mental health treatment under Section 2962 when it continues the parolee’s parole under Section 3001, the procedures of this section shall only be applicable for the purpose of determining if the parolee has a severe mental health disorder, whether the parolee’s severe mental health disorder is not in remission or cannot be kept in remission without treatment, and whether by reason of the parolee’s severe mental health disorder, the parolee represents a substantial danger of physical harm to
 others.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 963, Sec. 1.   (AB 2475)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2968.

If the prisoner’s severe mental health disorder is put into remission during the parole period, and can be kept in remission, the Director of State Hospitals shall notify the Board of Parole Hearings and the State Department of State Hospitals shall discontinue treating the parolee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 9, Sec. 9.   (AB 46)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2970.

(a) Not later than 180 days prior to the termination of parole, or release from prison if the prisoner refused to agree to treatment as a condition of parole as required by Section 2962, unless good cause is shown for the reduction of that 180-day period, if the parolee’s or prisoner’s severe mental health disorder is not in remission or cannot be kept in remission without treatment, the medical director of the state hospital that is treating the parolee, or the community program director in charge of the parolee’s outpatient program, or the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, shall submit to the district attorney of the county in which the parolee is receiving outpatient treatment, or for those in prison or in a state
 mental hospital, the district attorney of the county of commitment to prison, a written evaluation on remission. If requested by the district attorney, the written evaluation shall be accompanied by supporting affidavits.

(b) The district attorney may then file a petition with the superior court for continued involuntary treatment for one year. The petition shall be accompanied by affidavits specifying that treatment, while the prisoner was released from prison on parole, has been continuously provided by the State Department of State Hospitals either in a state hospital or in an outpatient program. The petition shall also specify that the prisoner has a severe mental health disorder, that the severe mental health disorder is not in remission or cannot be kept in remission if the person’s treatment is not continued, and that, by reason of the
 person’s severe mental health disorder, the prisoner represents a substantial danger of physical harm to others.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 9, Sec. 10.   (AB 46)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2972.

(a) (1) The court shall conduct a hearing on the petition under Section 2970 for continued treatment. The court shall advise the person of the right to be represented by an attorney and of the right to a jury trial. The attorney for the person shall be given a copy of the petition, and any supporting documents. The hearing shall be a civil hearing, however, in order to reduce costs the rules of criminal discovery, as well as civil discovery, shall be applicable. 

(2) The standard of proof under this section shall be proof beyond a reasonable doubt, and if the trial is by jury, the jury shall be unanimous in its verdict. The trial shall be by jury unless waived by
 both the person and the district attorney. The trial shall commence no later than 30 calendar days prior to the time the person would otherwise have been released, unless the time is waived by the person or unless good cause is shown.

(b) The people shall be represented by the district attorney. If the person is indigent, the county public defender shall be appointed.

(c) If the court or jury finds that the patient has a severe mental
 health disorder, that the patient’s severe mental health disorder is not in remission or cannot be kept in remission without treatment, and that by reason of the patient’s severe mental health disorder, the patient represents a substantial danger of physical harm to others, the court shall order the patient recommitted to the facility in which the patient was confined at the time the petition was filed, or recommitted to the outpatient program in which the patient was being treated at the time the petition was
 filed, or committed to the State Department of State Hospitals if the person was in prison. The commitment shall be for a period of one year from the date of termination of parole or a previous commitment or the scheduled date of release from prison as specified in Section 2970. Time spent on outpatient status, except when placed in a locked facility at the direction of the outpatient supervisor, shall not count as actual custody and shall not be credited toward the person’s maximum term of commitment or toward the person’s term of extended commitment.

(d) A person shall be released on outpatient status if the committing court finds that there is reasonable cause to believe that the committed person can be safely and effectively treated on an outpatient basis. Except as provided in this subdivision, the provisions of Title
 15 (commencing with Section 1600) of Part
 2 apply to persons placed on outpatient status pursuant to this paragraph. The standard for revocation under Section 1609 is that the person cannot be safely and effectively treated on an outpatient basis.

(e) Prior to the termination of a commitment under this section, a petition for recommitment may be filed to determine whether the patient’s severe mental health disorder is not in remission or cannot be kept in remission without treatment, and whether by reason of the patient’s severe mental health disorder, the patient represents a substantial danger of physical harm to others. The recommitment proceeding shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(f) A commitment under this article places an affirmative obligation on the
 treatment facility to provide treatment for the underlying causes of the person’s mental health disorder.

(g) Except as provided in this subdivision, the person committed shall be considered to be an involuntary mental health patient and
 shall be entitled to those rights set forth in Article 7 (commencing with Section 5325) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Commencing January 1, 1986, the State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, may adopt regulations to modify those rights as is necessary in order to provide for the reasonable security of the inpatient facility in which the patient is being held. This subdivision and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto shall become operative on January 1, 1987, except that regulations may be adopted prior to that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 9, Sec. 11.   (AB 46)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2972.1.

(a) Outpatient status for persons committed pursuant to Section 2972 shall be for a period not to exceed one year. Pursuant to Section 1606, at the end of a period of outpatient status approved by the court, the court shall, after actual notice to the prosecutor, the defense attorney, the community program director or a designee, the medical director of the facility that is treating the person, and the person on outpatient status, and after a hearing in court, either discharge the person from commitment under appropriate provisions of law, order the person confined to a treatment facility, or renew its approval of outpatient status.

(b) Prior to the hearing described in subdivision (a), the community program director or a designee shall furnish a report and recommendation to the court, the prosecution, the defense attorney, the medical director of the facility that is treating the person, and the person on outpatient status. If the recommendation is that the person continue on outpatient status or be confined to a treatment facility, the report shall also contain a statement that conforms with requirements of subdivision (c).

(c) (1) Upon receipt of a report prepared pursuant to Section 1606 that recommends confinement or continued outpatient treatment, the court shall direct prior defense counsel, or, if necessary, appoint new defense counsel, to meet and confer with the person who is on outpatient status and explain the recommendation contained therein. Following this meeting, both defense counsel and the person on outpatient status shall sign and return to the court a form which shall read as follows:
“Check One:
“____ I do not believe that I need further treatment and I demand a jury trial to decide this question.
“___ I accept the recommendation that I continue treatment.”

(2) The signed form shall be returned to the court at least 10 days prior to the hearing described in subdivision (a). If the person on outpatient status refuses or is unable to sign the form, his or her counsel shall indicate, in writing, that the form and the report prepared pursuant to Section 1606 were explained to the person and the person refused or was unable to sign the form.

(d) If the person on outpatient status either requests a jury trial or fails to waive his or her right to a jury trial, a jury trial meeting all of the requirements of Section 2972 shall be set within 60 days of the initial hearing.

(e) The trier of fact, or the court if trial is waived, shall determine whether or not the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 2972 have been met. The court shall then make an appropriate disposition under subdivision (a) of this section.

(f) The court shall notify the community program director or a designee, the person on outpatient status, and the medical director or person in charge of the facility providing treatment of the person whether or not the person was found suitable for release.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 324, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2974.

Before releasing any inmate or terminating supervision of any parolee who is a danger to self or others, or gravely disabled as a result of a mental health disorder, and who does not come within the provisions of Section 2962, the Director of Corrections may, upon probable cause, place, or cause to be placed, the person in a state hospital pursuant to the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act, Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 9, Sec. 12.   (AB 46)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2976.

(a) The cost of inpatient or outpatient treatment under Section 2962 or 2972 shall be a state expense while the person is under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the State Department of State Hospitals.

(b) Any person placed outside of a facility of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation for the purposes of inpatient treatment under this article shall not be deemed to be released from imprisonment or from the custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation prior to the expiration of the maximum term of imprisonment of the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 41.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2977.

A person committed to the care of the State Department of State Hospitals because he or she is a mentally disordered offender, including a person who is found not guilty by reason of insanity, is eligible for compassionate release pursuant to Section 4146 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. In any case in which the criteria for compassionate release apply, the State Department of State
 Hospitals shall follow the procedures and standards in Section 4146 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to determine if the department should recommend to the court that the person’s commitment be
 suspended for compassionate release. This section applies to persons committed for treatment during parole and persons committed pursuant to Section 2970. If the person for whom compassionate release is recommended is on parole, notice shall be given to the Board of Parole Hearings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 715, Sec. 3.   (SB 955)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2978.

(a) Any independent professionals appointed by the Board of Parole Hearings for purposes of this article shall not be state government employees. The independent professionals appointed shall have at least five years of experience in the diagnosis and treatment of mental health disorders and shall include psychiatrists and licensed psychologists who have a doctoral degree in psychology.

(b) On July 1 of each year the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the State Department of State Hospitals shall submit to the Board of Parole Hearings a list of 20 or more independent professionals on which both departments concur. The professionals shall not be state government
 employees and shall have at least five years of experience in the diagnosis and treatment of mental health disorders and shall include psychiatrists and licensed psychologists who have a doctoral degree in psychology. For purposes of this article, once the Board of Parole Hearings receives the list, it shall only appoint independent professionals from the list. The list is not binding on the Board of Parole Hearings until it has received the list, and is not binding after June 30 following receipt of the list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 9, Sec. 13.   (AB 46)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2980.

This article applies to persons who committed their crimes on and after January 1, 1986.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 228, Sec. 5.   Effective July 27, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

2981.

For the purpose of proving the fact that a prisoner has received 90 days or more of treatment within the year prior to the prisoner’s parole or release, the records or copies of records of any state penitentiary, county jail, federal penitentiary, or state hospital in which that person has been confined, when the records or copies thereof have been certified by the official custodian of those records, may be admitted as evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 687, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Length of Term of Imprisonment and Paroles [3000. - 3089.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [3000. - 3007.09.]

3000.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that the period immediately following incarceration is critical to successful reintegration of the offender into society and to positive citizenship. It is in the interest of public safety for the state to provide for the effective supervision of and surveillance of parolees, including the judicious use of revocation actions, and to provide educational, vocational, family, and personal counseling necessary to assist parolees in the transition between imprisonment and discharge. A sentence resulting in imprisonment in the state prison pursuant to Section 1168 or 1170 shall include a period of parole supervision or postrelease community supervision, unless waived, or as otherwise provided in this article.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that it is not the intent of this section to diminish resources allocated to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation for parole functions for which the department is responsible. It is also not the intent of this section to diminish the resources allocated to the Board of Parole Hearings to execute its duties with respect to parole functions for which the board is responsible.

(3) The Legislature finds and declares that diligent effort must be made to ensure that parolees are held accountable for their criminal behavior, including, but not limited to, the satisfaction of restitution fines and orders.

(4) For any person subject to a sexually violent predator proceeding pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 6600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, an order issued by a judge
 pursuant to Section 6601.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, finding that the petition, on its face, supports a finding of probable cause to believe that the individual named in the petition is likely to engage in sexually violent predatory criminal behavior upon release, shall toll the period of parole of that person, from the date that person is released by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation as follows:

(A) If the person is committed to the State Department of State Hospitals as a sexually violent predator and subsequently a court orders that the person be unconditionally discharged, the parole period shall be tolled until the date the judge enters the order unconditionally discharging that person.

(B) If the person is not committed to the State Department of State Hospitals as a sexually violent predator, the tolling of the parole period shall be abrogated and